Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1828
Reorganization or change of control; approval required.

(1) No reorganization or change of control of a jurisdictional utility shall take place without prior approval by the commission. The commission shall not approve any proposed reorganization or change of control if the commission finds, after public notice and public hearing, that the reorganization or change of control will adversely affect the utility's ability to serve its ratepayers.

(2) For purposes of this section, reorganization or change of control means any transaction which, regardless of the means by which it is accomplished, results in a change in the ownership of a majority of the voting capital stock of a jurisdictional utility and does not include a mortgage or pledge transaction entered into to secure a bona fide borrowing by the party granting the mortgage or making the pledge.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 28.